Washington statutes.
RCW 43.05.060

Department of ecology—Notice of correction.

(1) If in the course of any site inspection or visit that is not a technical assistance visit, the department of ecology becomes aware of conditions that are not in compliance with applicable laws and rules enforced by the department and are not subject to civil penalties as provided for in RCW 43.05.070, the department may issue a notice of correction to the responsible party that shall include:

(a) A description of the condition that is not in compliance and the text of the specific section or subsection of the applicable state or federal law or rule;

(b) A statement of what is required to achieve compliance;

(c) The date by which the department requires compliance to be achieved;

(d) Notice of the means to contact any technical assistance services provided by the department or others; and

(e) Notice of when, where, and to whom a request to extend the time to achieve compliance for good cause may be filed with the department.

(2) A notice of correction is not a formal enforcement action, is not subject to appeal, and is a public record.

(3) If the department issues a notice of correction, it shall not issue a civil penalty for the violations identified in the notice of correction unless the responsible party fails to comply with the notice.

[ 1996 c 206 s 3; 1995 c 403 s 607.]

NOTES:

Findings—1996 c 206: See note following RCW 43.05.030.